dictionaries/nn_NO/nn_NO.aff
SET UTF-8

# This is generated from 
# make words.nn; perl -ne 'print join "\n", split //' words.nn | \
# sort | uniq -c | sort -rn | awk '{print $2}' | tr -d "\n";echo
TRY earnstilkogdmupvfbjøyhåæcSzBéwêHATMKFGLNREVxôODòPèCJIUWqØÅóYQçZüäXÄþë

COMPOUNDFLAG z

COMPOUNDMIN 4


PFX a Y 1
PFX a   0     u           .

PFX b Y 1
PFX b   0     for         .

PFX c Y 1
PFX c   0     gjen        .

PFX d Y 1
PFX d   0     hovud       .

PFX e Y 1
PFX e   0     mis         .

PFX f Y 1
PFX f   0     sam         .

PFX g Y 4
PFX g   0     in          [^blmpr]
PFX g   0     il          l
PFX g   0     im          [bmp]
PFX g   0     ir          r

PFX h Y 1
PFX h   0     etter       .

PFX i Y 1
PFX i   0     til         .

PFX j Y 1
PFX j   0     over        .

PFX k Y 1
PFX k   0     under       .

PFX l Y 1
PFX l   0     på          .

PFX m Y 1
PFX m   0     av          .

PFX n Y 1
PFX n   0     inn         .

PFX o Y 1
PFX o   0     ut          .

PFX p Y 1
PFX p   0     opp         .

PFX q Y 1
PFX q   0     ned         .

PFX r Y 1
PFX r   0     om          .

PFX s Y 1
PFX s   0     saman       .

SFX t Y 4
SFX t   e     ing         e
SFX t   e     inga        e
SFX t   0     ing         [aiouyøå]
SFX t   0     inga        [aiouyøå]

SFX u N 6
SFX u   0     leg         [^lm]
SFX u   0     lege        [^lm]
SFX u   0     eg          l
SFX u   0     ege         l
SFX u   0     meleg       m
SFX u   0     melege      m

SFX x Y 2
SFX x   0     skap        [^e]
SFX x   e     skap        e

SFX y Y 8
SFX y   0     itet        [aeiouyø][dlmnrsv]
SFX y   0     iteten      [aeiouyø][dlmnrsv]
SFX y   ell   alitet      ell
SFX y   ell   aliteten    ell
SFX y   ær    aritet      ær
SFX y   ær    ariteten    ær
SFX y   e     ning        e
SFX y   e     ningen      e

SFX A Y 13
SFX A   0     n           e
SFX A   é     een         é
SFX A   0     en          [^eém]
SFX A   0     men         [^e][dk]am
SFX A   0     en          [e][dk]am
SFX A   0     men         [^k][lr]em
SFX A   0     en          krem
SFX A   0     en          [^r]em
SFX A   0     en          [^aeouø]m
SFX A   0     men         [bdgv]om
SFX A   0     en          [^bglv]om
SFX A   0     men         [skl]um
SFX A   0     en          [^skl]um

SFX B Y 17
SFX B   0     t           e
SFX B   é     eet         é
SFX B   er    ret         [^drt][dt]er
SFX B   el    let         [fgksv]el
SFX B   el    let         mpel
SFX B   tel   let         ttel
SFX B   0     et          [^eém]
SFX B   0     et          [^aeou]m
SFX B   0     met         [^e]am
SFX B   0     et          eam
SFX B   0     met         [jv]em
SFX B   0     et          [^jlv]em
SFX B   0     et          lem
SFX B   0     met         [rk]om
SFX B   0     et          [^rk]om
SFX B   0     et          [^ei]um
SFX B   um    et          [ei]um

SFX C Y 32
SFX C   e     a           e
SFX C   é     ea          é
SFX C   0     a           [^eélmrt]
SFX C   0     a           [^e]t
SFX C   et    a           et
SFX C   0     a           [^e][lr]
SFX C   el    la          [^dfkmnpstj]el
SFX C   0     a           jel
SFX C   del   la          ddel
SFX C   0     a           [^d]del
SFX C   fel   la          ffel
SFX C   kel   la          kkel
SFX C   el    la          [^k]kel
SFX C   mel   la          mmel
SFX C   0     a           [^m]mel
SFX C   0     a           nel
SFX C   pel   la          ppel
SFX C   0     a           [^p]pel
SFX C   sel   la          ssel
SFX C   el    la          [^s]sel
SFX C   tel   la          ttel
SFX C   el    la          [^t]tel
SFX C   er    ra          [^fjm]er
SFX C   0     a           [fjm]er
SFX C   0     a           [^aeou]m
SFX C   0     ma          am
SFX C   0     ma          jem
SFX C   0     a           [^j]em
SFX C   0     ma          [rv]om
SFX C   0     a           [^rv]om
SFX C   0     a           [^eir]um
SFX C   um    a           [eir]um

SFX D Y 35
SFX D   e     ar          e
SFX D   é     ear         é
SFX D   0     ar          [^eélmr]
SFX D   0     ar          [^e][lr]
SFX D   el    lar         [^dfkmnpstj]el
SFX D   0     ar          jel
SFX D   del   lar         ddel
SFX D   0     ar          [^d]del
SFX D   fel   lar         ffel
SFX D   kel   lar         kkel
SFX D   el    lar         [^k]kel
SFX D   mel   lar         mmel
SFX D   0     ar          [^m]mel
SFX D   0     ar          nel
SFX D   pel   lar         ppel
SFX D   el    lar         [^p]pel
SFX D   sel   lar         ssel
SFX D   el    lar         [^s]sel
SFX D   tel   lar         ttel
SFX D   el    lar         [^t]tel
SFX D   ar    rar         [^fmk]er
SFX D   er    rar         ker
SFX D   0     ar          [^aeouø]m
SFX D   0     mar         dlem
SFX D   0     ar          blem
SFX D   0     ar          [^lr]em
SFX D   0     mar         [^kbd][lr]em
SFX D   0     ar          krem
SFX D   0     mar         [aø]m
SFX D   0     mar         [bdg]om
SFX D   0     ar          [^s][bdgl]om
SFX D   0     ar          [^bdgl]om
SFX D   0     ar          [^eiks]um
SFX D   0     mar         [ks]um
SFX D   um    ar          [ei]um

SFX E Y 37
SFX E   0     r           e
SFX E   é     eer         é
SFX E   0     er          [^eélmr]
SFX E   0     er          [^e][lr]
SFX E   el    ler         [^dfkmnpstj]el
SFX E   0     er          jel
SFX E   del   ler         ddel
SFX E   0     er          [^d]del
SFX E   fel   ler         ffel
SFX E   kel   ler         kkel
SFX E   el    ler         [^k]kel
SFX E   mel   ler         mmel
SFX E   0     er          [^m]mel
SFX E   0     er          nel
SFX E   pel   ler         ppel
SFX E   el    ler         [^p]pel
SFX E   sel   ler         ssel
SFX E   el    ler         [^s]sel
SFX E   tel   ler         ttel
SFX E   el    ler         [^t]tel
SFX E   er    re          [^fmk]er
SFX E   fer   re          fer
SFX E   mer   re          mer
SFX E   ker   re          ker
SFX E   0     er          [^aeouø]m
SFX E   0     mer         dlem
SFX E   0     er          [bd]lem
SFX E   0     er          [^lr]em
SFX E   0     mer         [^kbd][lr]em
SFX E   0     er          krem
SFX E   0     mer         [aø]m
SFX E   0     mer         [bdgl]om
SFX E   0     er          [^s][bdgl]om
SFX E   0     er          [^bdgl]om
SFX E   0     er          [^eiks]um
SFX E   0     mer         [ks]um
SFX E   um    er          [ei]um

SFX F Y 37
SFX F   e     ane         e
SFX F   é     eane        é
SFX F   0     ane         [^eélmr]
SFX F   0     ane         [^e][lr]
SFX F   el    lane        [^dfkmnpstj]el
SFX F   0     ane         jel
SFX F   del   lane        ddel
SFX F   0     ane         [^d]del
SFX F   fel   lane        ffel
SFX F   kel   lane        kkel
SFX F   el    lane        [^k]kel
SFX F   mel   lane        mmel
SFX F   0     ane         [^m]mel
SFX F   0     ane         nel
SFX F   pel   lane        ppel
SFX F   el    lane        [^p]pel
SFX F   sel   lane        ssel
SFX F   el    lane        [^s]sel
SFX F   tel   lane        ttel
SFX F   el    lane        [^t]tel
SFX F   er    rane        [^fm]er
SFX F   fer   rane        fer
SFX F   mer   rane        mer
SFX F   0     ane         [^aeouø]m
SFX F   0     mane        [aø]m
SFX F   0     mane        jem
SFX F   0     mane        dlem
SFX F   0     ane         blem
SFX F   0     mane        [^kbd][lr]em
SFX F   0     ane         krem
SFX F   0     ane         [^jlr]em
SFX F   0     mane        [bdgr]om
SFX F   0     ane         [^s][bdgl]om
SFX F   0     ane         [^bdglr]om
SFX F   0     ane         [^eiks]um
SFX F   0     mane        [ks]um
SFX F   um    ane         [ei]um
