dictionaries/nn_NO/nn_NO.dic
arbeidsbord/BCf
arbeidskontor/BCf
armkrik/ADF
arrestløyve/BCW
arveavgift/CEG
audmjuk/CDVWXx
augnespleis/ADF
avansestopp/ABCDF
aviskjede/CEG
avlsproduktiv/VWXy
avseie/CEKRSt
banda/f
befolkningsinnslag/BC
behandlingsalternativ/BC
besteborgar/ADFu
bestemd/VXa
bilkontroll/ADF
bitter/ALWu
bjoda/e
blind/CDEGVWXxz
blodlever/CFGD
blomekasse/ACDEFG
bondefange/CDKRSYt
botnlegg/CV
brakketillegg/BC
brukane/ef
brukar/ADFMez
bruken/ef
brutal/VWXy
bua/f
budsjettmodell/ADF
burman/ADF
bydast/e
byrge/CDKORSx
bærtege/CEG
celleforandring/CDF
cellist/ADF
commandolaup/BC
danningi/e
datert/Va
denge/ACDEFKOQRSt
dogmatikar/ADF
drankar/ADFM
drifti/f
duge/ACDEFKQRSuy
dummelet/C
dyrkingsmedium/BCU
dåne/CDKRSt
dæle/CEGQ
dødsbod/BCx
egal/VWXy
einaktar/ADF
einse/KRa
eksister/VWf
eplesider/AFD
etterhandsaming/CDF
etterspørselskurve/CEG
fag/BCEuz
fagdepartement/BC
far/ABCDFJMVW\uxz
fatal/VWXy
favorisere/CEKOSYt
fenn/CEGVW
ferdastav/ADF
ferdene/f
ferer/e
festa/f
fjellnatur/A
fjellsikringstenest/CEGV
fjerdingsår/BC
flane/CDEKRS
fordrei/CDEPSVYt
forfattar/ADFxz
forgjengeligdom/ADFa
formaste/CDKRStu
formell/VWXy
formuesinntekt/CEG
forsimpl/CDV
forsterkingsbehov/BC
forståing/CDF\e
forsøksdyrking/CDF
fortei/CESVYt
fostret/Ce
fredsdialog/ADF
fredsleir/ADF
fredsåri/a
fremmend/VWXxz
frikyrkje/CEGuz
fyrverkeri/BC
fødd/Va
førande/f
førelesne/Y_t
føremiddagstreff/ABCDF
galder/ABCEFL
gale/ABCKOQSWxy
generøs/VWXy
geofysikar/ADF
gjennomfart/ADFJ\
gjennomsnittsproduksjon/A
gjestevenn/ADEFGux
gjørleg/VXa
gledebod/BCx
godbarn/BC
grendelag/BC
grise/ABCDEFGKRSTWtuz
grådig/VXx
gråfarge/ACDEFG
guddom/ADFu
gunstig/VXa
habil/VWXy
halda/ef
handelsflåte/ADF
handelsnæring/CDF\
handlande/e
handlingsxxxx/ef
hanrei/ADF
heimføding/ADFx
hemme/CDKSYtu
heppen/Wa
hetse/ACDFKRSt
hovudilske/CEG
hugsast/e
human/VWXyz
husdyrlære/CEG
hustyrann/ADF
hærmann/AMu
høgleik/ADF
høgskolelærer/AFD
høgskulemiljø/BCz
hørlig/VXa
hørslor/e
høyrslone/e
illojal/VWXy
infertil/VWy
innrullere/CEKOSt
invalid/ADFVXy
jam/CDEFJVWxz
jarnseng/CEG
jerntriangel/ABCDF
jordbærstad/A
kabelutbyggar/ADF
kassere/CDEKOSt
kausal/VWXy
kavlebru/CEG
kjælen/VWXx
kjærastfolk/BC
kjørande/f
kladdesnø/ADF
klangen/ef
klekke/CEKRSYtuz
kleveg/ADF
kling/ACDEFGV
klåra/a
kneppe/ABCDEFKRSWt
knølkval/ADF
kostnadsnøytral/VWy
kraftavtale/ACDEFG
kremere/CEKOSYt
kriminaljournalistikk/A
krinsmeister/AFx
kroningar/Mf
krøll/ABCDEFGV
kulelageret/C
kunnskap/ADFJ\
kvalifiseringskurs/BC
lagas/Wa
landsveg/ADF
lar/af
laus/VWXuz
leddorm/ADF
legene/af
legge/ABCDEFGKRSWYt
leveleg/VXa
like/ABCDEFGJKORSW`uxz
line/BCDEGKMQRSWYtyz
livslagnad/AEG
livslære/Cf
ljosstråle/ADF
lydnadane/a
lønssteg/BC
magekreftpasient/ADF
malande/f
manipulere/CEKOSYt
mannsferdi/a
manntalsførar/ADF
marked/BC
materialisme/ADFg
matrikulera/g
matrikulerast/g
meister/ACEFuxz
metall/BCxz
metallisere/CEKOSYt
metusalem/DF
migrant/ADFgz
migrera/g
migrerast/g
minnas/We
mobilitet/ADFg
modent/a
morfinist/ADF
motemedvite/A
musikal/ADFy
natt/CDEVuz
nemning/CDFf
nettoløn/CEG
nissehuve/CEG
nittiåring/ADF
novembermørke/BW
omskule/CDEKORSY_t
oppfatt/CDVe
oppseieleg/VXa
organisasjonen/f
original/ADFVWXyz
overkom/ACVZu
pala/g
pant/ABCDEFVz
pantegjeld/CEG
pelargonium/ACDFU
pensjon/ADEFJ\
perfektum/BCUg
perfektå/g
permeabel/VWXg
pianomeister/AFxD
planlegge/CDKRSUY_t
politisamarbeid/B\
portforbod/BCg
potent/VXg
profesjonell/VWXy
prosjektstyre/BWt
proteksjon/ADF
radiotale/ACDEFG
rasjonalismane/g
rasjonalisme/ADFg
rasjonellare/ag
rasjonelle/KRag
realare/ag
reale/KRag
reellare/ag
regiansvar/Bu
regularitet/ADFg
reitt/a
rekne/CDKRSY_etz
religiøs/VWXgy
reseptiv/VWXy
ringjast/f
risting/CEG
rominnhald/BC
rugavling/CDF
runde/ACDFKRSYtuz
rundvelt/A
røyne/BCEJKOQRSWYt
salve/ACDEFGKRSYt
sannsynl/u
seglingi/f
semjer/Ma
sjakk/ADFWz
sjalusi/ADFx
skitenkledevask/ABCDF
skjøkehus/BC
skote/ABCDEGKRSWy
skumme/BCDKRSW
slarve/ABCDFKRSTWu
slaske/ABCDFKRSTW
slyngestokk/ADF
slått/ACDEFGVz
sommarbeite/BCWt
spissborgar/ADFux
sprettast/a
standardutstyr/BC
statskyrkje/CEGuz
stemningi/e
sterkstraumanlegg/BC
stike/CDKORSy
surmul/CDV
sær/JVWuz
søndagsmiddag/A
talande/ef
tangblære/CEG
tekstilhandverkar/ADF
tenger/Ma
tenkjast/e
tidvatn/BC
tillitsvotai/e
tjafs/ABCDFV
tolkingi/e
traktere/CEKOSYt
trava/u
tryggja/a
tusj/ACDEFVz
tvile/ACDEFKORSe
ugild/CDVWXx
undersøkingsperson/ADF
universal/VWXyz
unntaksmogelegheit/CEG
uroppføre/CEKOQRSYt
utfør/CEVWu
utstyrsmagasin/BC
utvikla/a
utviklingskonsulent/ADF
uærlig/VXx
vaksi/e
venstrevride/AQYt
virki/f
visesong/ADF
vond/BCVWXxz
vrakdykking/CDF
ytter/u
ytterklede/BCWy
åttedel/ADF
ølsuppe/CEG
ønskjedikt/BC
